California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The department shall develop, disseminate, and update, on a periodic basis, claims preparation and processing software programs that may be used on computers at individual provider or billing service sites. The software shall be made available, to the extent feasible, for the most common computers used in the provider
 community for use, on an optional basis, by clerical or billing personnel to facilitate the preparation and submission of Medi-Cal claims for services rendered.

(b) The software programs specified in subdivision (a) shall, to the extent possible:

(1) Contain all necessary validity edits utilized by the fiscal intermediary. 

(2) Be designed to reasonably reduce common submission and billing errors.

(3) Contain features that provide options for the provider to use provider-developed files to reduce data entry requirements and improve reporting accuracy. 

(4) Provide, at the provider’s discretion, for the electronic or paper transmission of claims to the Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary.

(c) The department shall consult with affected provider groups prior to developing, disseminating, and updating claims preparation and processing software pursuant to this section.

(d) The department shall report to the Chairpersons of the Senate Health and Human Services Committee and Assembly Health Committee by April 1, 1990, on a plan and timetable for implementing this section. The plan and timetable shall identify provider groups for which the department plans to develop, disseminate, and update claims preparation and processing software.

(e) Notwithstanding the plan and timetable required by subdivision (d), the department shall develop and begin disseminating claims processing software programs to physician providers no later than January 1, 1991.

(f) The department shall, as part of implementing this section, provide technical assistance to providers, including, but not limited to, a user hotline and appropriate training materials. These materials shall cover the installation of the programs, use of the software to enter Medi-Cal claims data, and submission procedures.

(g) The software programs for the submission of Medi-Cal claims shall be made available to all interested parties for a reasonable initial fee, plus an annual subscription fee for updates, maintenance, and support provided to users. Fees shall be set so as to recover, as nearly as possible, the development, distribution, and ongoing support costs of software programs, instructional materials, or subsequent updates.

(h) Third-party vendors may obtain and enhance these programs for resale and provisions of value-added services to Medi-Cal
 providers. However, the state or any of its officials, employees, or agents shall bear no liability for software provided through any third party that has been altered or misused by any third party.

(i) Neither the state nor any of its officials, employees, or agents shall be responsible for any of the following:

(1) A provider’s failure to meet Medi-Cal documentation and billing requirements, including timely billing pursuant to Section 14115.

(2) Alteration or misuse of the software in the submission of claims to the Medi-Cal program.

(3) Use of the software for any purpose other than the submission of claims to the Medi-Cal program.

(4) This subdivision shall not apply to any failure to
 meet Medi-Cal documentation and billing requirements that is substantiated as resulting from the use of software that is directly provided by the department and that contains proven flaws or defects that significantly contribute to the failure to meet those requirements.

(j) A provider or third party’s eligibility to bill claims electronically by using software programs made available pursuant to this section shall be governed by Section 14040 and Section 14040.5, and any rules and regulations adopted by the director pursuant to these sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 239.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14042.

Each contract for fiscal intermediary services shall provide for an automated system for verifying the eligibility of Medi-Cal recipients. The automated eligibility verification system shall provide the health care provider with a unique method of identifying the eligibility of the beneficiary. The provider shall include the eligibility identifier on the claim for payment. Where a recipient’s
 eligibility has been verified by the automated system and the provider provides a unique identifier on the claim form, the director may not require any label, card impression, or any other evidence to establish the recipient’s eligibility. The automated system for eligibility verification shall provide for the continuous updating of recipient eligibility determination.

The department shall periodically test the automated system for verifying recipient eligibility for completeness and accuracy, and report the findings of such testing to the Legislature. Unless and until the automated system for verifying recipient eligibility is accurate in at least 97 percent of the cases tested, the director shall provide for the issuance of proof-of-eligibility labels, or identity cards from which an identifying impression may be taken, or other evidence of eligibility to be used as a secondary recipient eligibility verification system. Notwithstanding the inability to provide
 verification of a recipient’s eligibility through use of the automated system for eligibility verification, presentation of a claim for service with evidence of recipient eligibility as is provided for by the secondary system shall conclusively establish the recipient’s eligibility.

On-line access shall be available to providers, at their discretion, upon the payment of a reasonable fee. The department shall establish the amount of the fees charged to providers for on-line access, which shall be based upon the costs of providing on-line access to providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1508, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14042.1.

(a) No earlier than January 1, 2018, the State Department of Health Care Services shall establish a Medically Tailored Meals Pilot Program to operate for a period of four years from the date the program is established, or until funding is no longer available for the program, whichever date is earlier.

(1) The department shall determine the number of eligible participants and providers in the program and shall use data from the Medi-Cal program to identify eligible beneficiaries for participation in the program.

(2) The program shall provide medically tailored meal intervention services to Medi-Cal participants with one or
 more of the following health conditions: congestive heart failure, cancer,
 diabetes, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, or renal disease.

(3) The department may establish additional eligibility requirements based on acuity and other selection criteria. Each participant in the program shall receive a standard intervention, as determined by the department, of up to 21 meals per week for 12 to 24 weeks. The provided meals shall be medically tailored and designed to meet the specific nutritional needs of the participant’s specific illness.

(4) The program shall be conducted in the Counties of Alameda, Los Angeles, Marin, San Diego, San Francisco, San Mateo, Santa Clara, and Sonoma.

(5) (A) At the conclusion of the program, the department shall use the
 data from the Medi-Cal program on the program participants to evaluate what impact, to the extent it can be determined, the program had on hospital readmissions, decreased admissions to long-term care facilities, and emergency room utilization.

(B) The department shall send a report containing its evaluation to the Legislature within 12 months after the end of the four-year program.

(C) The legislative report submitted pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “medically tailored meals” means a specifically tailored diet to address the participant’s specific medical condition and associated symptoms.

(c) The department shall develop a methodology for reimbursing contractors, or other entities, as applicable, for services or activities provided pursuant to this section based on, and not to exceed, the aggregate amount of funds allocated per year for purposes of the program. The department may use up to 20 percent of the funds allocated per year for the program to support its administration and evaluation.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of policy letters, all-county letters, plan letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(e) For purposes of implementing this section, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(f) The department shall seek any federal approvals necessary to implement this section, including any waivers it deems necessary to obtain federal financial participation for the program, and shall claim
 federal financial participation to the full extent permitted by law. If federal financial participation is unavailable, the department shall implement the program using available state-only funds, subject to annual appropriation by the Legislature.

(g) (1) For the 2021–2022 fiscal year, in addition to the Medically Tailored Meals Pilot Program specified under subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, the department shall implement the Short-Term Medically Tailored Meals Intervention Services Program to award funds to qualified entities providing medically tailored meals intervention services to eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries who reside in a county identified in paragraph (4) with one or more of the following health conditions described in subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive, when meal services are unavailable
 under the Medically Tailored Meals Pilot Program:

(A) Diabetes.

(B) Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.

(C) Renal disease.

(D) Chronic kidney disease.

(E) Cancer.

(F) Malnutrition.

(G) Human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency syndrome.

(H) Congestive heart failure.

(2) The Short-Term Medically Tailored Meals
 Intervention Services Program shall cease to be operative when the funding allocated under the Budget Act of 2021 has been exhausted, or on June 30, 2022, whichever is sooner.

(3) (A) To the extent funding is available, an eligible Medi-Cal beneficiary shall receive medically tailored meals intervention services as specified in subparagraph (B).

(B) (i) For the 2021–2022 fiscal year, medically tailored meals intervention services shall be available to an eligible Medi-Cal beneficiary, and they shall receive up to 21 meals per week for 12 to 52 weeks, for a maximum of 52 weeks, depending on the medical diagnosis and need. The meals shall be medically tailored and designed to meet the specific nutritional needs of the Medi-Cal beneficiary’s
 specific health condition.

(ii) To the extent funding is available, the medically tailored meals intervention services shall include medical nutrition therapy or counseling for the program’s participants.

(C) The department may implement, as specified in subdivision (d), and in consultation with medically tailored meals providers, additional eligibility requirements for individuals to receive services under the Short-Term Medically Tailored Meals Intervention Services Program, based on acuity and other selection criteria.

(4) Funds appropriated for the Short-Term Medically Tailored Meals Intervention Services Program shall be awarded based on a methodology developed by the department to nonprofit and community-based
 organizations that have expertise as medically tailored meals providers in the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Fresno, Kings, Los Angeles, Madera, Marin, San Diego, San Francisco, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Sonoma, and Tulare.

(5) Providers that are awarded funding to provide short-term medically tailored meals intervention services shall monitor and document the impacts of the Short-Term Medically Tailored Meals Intervention Services Program, including, but not limited to, the effect of this program on hospital readmissions, emergency room utilization, and health outcomes, to the extent data is available, and shall provide that information to the department upon request, and in a form and manner specified by the department. This information shall not be included in the data considered in evaluating the Medically Tailored
 Meals Pilot Program, as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).

(6) The department shall develop a methodology for reimbursing contractors or other entities, as applicable, for services or activities provided pursuant to this subdivision based on, and not to exceed, the aggregate amount of funds allocated for purposes of this subdivision. The department shall allocate 5 percent of the funds to a nonprofit organization fiscal sponsor that shall coordinate the program to support its administration. The fiscal sponsor shall work with nonprofit members in relevant regions.

(7) To the extent permitted under applicable federal and state law, the department may use data from the Medi-Cal program to identify Medi-Cal beneficiaries eligible to receive services under the
 Short-Term Medically Tailored Meals Intervention Services Program.

(8) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent the department determines that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is not jeopardized.

(h) This section shall remain in effect until the department submits its report containing its evaluation of the Medically Tailored Meals Pilot Program to the Legislature pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), or 12 months after the end of the Medically Tailored Meals Pilot Program or the Short-Term Medically Tailored Meals Intervention Services Program, whichever occurs last, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 368.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Section repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14042.2.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) The Medi-Cal Managed Care Ombudsman helps resolve issues between Medi-Cal managed care members and health plans, assists members with managed care related questions and problems, and answers questions from members.

(2) A pattern of inquiries, complaints, and grievances may be indicators of systemic problems regarding coverage and problems with access to care and warrant consideration.

(b) On a quarterly basis, the State Department of Health Care Services shall report on calls received by the Medi-Cal Managed Care Ombudsman. At a minimum, the report shall include the
 following:

(1) The number of contacts received, separated by inquiries and complaints.

(2) The average wait time for callers to answer.

(3) The number of calls abandoned.

(4) The result of contacts, including destination of referred calls, when possible.

(5) The average call time.

(6) Complaints, by issue type.

(7) The number of calls referred to another area of the department or to the Department of Managed Health Care for resolution.

(c) All data collected and reported shall include demographic
 information of beneficiaries, including race, ethnicity, age, gender, preferred language, language members were assisted in, and county of residence, and health plans of beneficiaries, to the extent known to the department at the time of the call. The department shall request, but not require, this information from members during the calls.

(d) The quarterly report shall include contacts from county mental health plan beneficiaries, as defined in Section 14700, including the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b).

(e) The quarterly report shall be posted on the department’s internet website.

(f) The fourth quarterly report issued each year also shall include information pertaining to the following:

(1) Training protocols for staff, including cultural
 and linguistic competency.

(2) Assessment of contacts trends and actions taken by the State Department of Health Care Services as a result of contacts received.

(3) Consumer assistance protocols, procedures, and referral tools.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14043.1 (as added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 52, Sec. 23) by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 320.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.3. Provider Enrollment, Application, and Participation [14043. - 14045.]

14043.

In order to ensure the proper and efficient administration of the Medi-Cal program, every applicant, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 14043.1, and every provider, as defined in subdivision (o) of Section 14043.1, shall be subject to the requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 192, Sec. 1.   (AB 1783)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Note: Sections 14040 to 14042 are located following Section 14029.91, at the end of Article 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.1.

As used in this article:

(a) “Abuse” means either of the following:

(1) Practices that are inconsistent with sound fiscal or business practices and result in unnecessary cost to the federal Medicaid and Medicare programs, the Medi-Cal program, another state’s Medicaid program, or other health care programs operated, or financed in whole or in part, by the federal government or a state or local agency in this state or another state.

(2) Practices that are inconsistent with sound medical practices and result in reimbursement by the federal Medicaid and Medicare programs, the Medi-Cal program or other health care
 programs operated, or financed in whole or in part, by the federal government or a state or local agency in this state or another state, for services that are unnecessary or for substandard items or services that fail to meet professionally recognized standards for health care.

(b) “Applicant” means an individual, including an ordering, referring, or prescribing individual, partnership, group, association, corporation, institution, or entity, and the officers, directors, owners, managing employees, or agents thereof, that apply to the department for enrollment as a provider in the Medi-Cal program.

(c) “Application or application package” means a completed and signed application form, signed under penalty of perjury or notarized pursuant to Section 14043.25, a disclosure statement, a provider agreement, and all attachments or changes in the form, statement, or agreement.

(d) “Appropriate volume of business” means a volume that is consistent with the information provided in the application and any supplemental information provided by the applicant or provider, and is of a quality and type that would reasonably be expected based upon the size and type of business operated by the applicant or provider.

(e) “Business address” means the location where an applicant or provider provides services, goods, supplies, or merchandise, directly or indirectly, to a Medi-Cal beneficiary. A post office box or commercial box is not a business address. The business address for the location of a vehicle or vessel owned and operated by an applicant or provider enrolled in the Medi-Cal program and used to provide services, goods, supplies, or merchandise, directly or indirectly, to a Medi-Cal beneficiary shall either be the business address location listed on the
 provider’s application as the location where similar services, goods, supplies, or merchandise would be provided or the applicant’s or provider’s pay to address.

(f) “Convicted” means any of the following:

(1) A judgment of conviction has been entered against an individual or entity by a federal, state, or local court, regardless of whether there is a posttrial motion, an appeal pending, or the judgment of conviction or other record relating to the criminal conduct has been expunged or otherwise removed.

(2) A federal, state, or local court has made a finding of guilt against an individual or entity.

(3) A federal, state, or local court has accepted a plea of guilty or nolo contendere by an individual or entity.

(4) An individual or entity has entered into participation in a first offender, deferred adjudication, or other program or arrangement where judgment of conviction has been withheld.

(g) “Debt due and owing” means 60 days have passed since a notice or demand for repayment of an overpayment or another amount resulting from an audit or examination, for a penalty assessment, or for another amount due to the department was sent to the provider, regardless of whether the provider is an institutional provider or a noninstitutional provider and regardless of whether an appeal is pending.

(h) “Enrolled or enrollment in the Medi-Cal program” means authorized under any processes by the department or its agents or contractors to receive, directly or indirectly, reimbursement for the provision of services, goods, supplies, or
 merchandise to a Medi-Cal beneficiary.

(i) “Fraud” means an intentional deception or misrepresentation made by a person with the knowledge that the deception could result in some unauthorized benefit to himself or herself or some other person. It includes any act that constitutes fraud under applicable federal or state law.

(j) “Location” means a street, city, or rural route address or a site or place within a street, city, or rural route address, and the city, county, state, and nine-digit ZIP Code.

(k) “Not currently enrolled at the location for which the application is submitted” means either of the following:

(1) The provider is changing location and moving to a different location than that for which the provider was issued a provider number.

(2) The provider is adding a business address.

(l) (1) “Individual dentist practice” means a dentist licensed by the Dental Board of California enrolled or enrolling in Medi-Cal as an individual provider who is a sole proprietor of his or her practice or is a corporation owned solely by the individual dentist and the only dentist practitioner is the owner. An individual dentist practice may include nondentist allied dental health professionals employed and supervised by the dentist.

(2) “Individual physician practice” means a physician and surgeon licensed by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California enrolled or enrolling in Medi-Cal as an individual provider who is sole proprietor of his or her practice or is a corporation owned solely by the individual
 physician and the only physician practitioner is the owner. An individual physician practice may include nonphysician medical practitioners employed and supervised by the physician.

(m) “Preenrollment period” or “preenrollment” includes the period of time during which an application package for enrollment, continued enrollment, or for the addition of or change in a location is pending.

(n) “Professionally recognized standards of health care” means statewide or national standards of care, whether in writing or not, that professional peers of the individual or entity whose provision of care is an issue recognize as applying to those peers practicing or providing care within a state. When the United States Department of Health and Human Services has declared a treatment modality not to be safe and effective, practitioners that employ that treatment modality shall be deemed not to
 meet professionally recognized standards of health care. This subdivision shall not be construed to mean that all other treatments meet professionally recognized standards of care.

(o) “Provider” means an individual, partnership, group, association, corporation, institution, or entity, and the officers, directors, owners, managing employees, or agents of a partnership, group association, corporation, institution, or entity, that provides services, goods, supplies, or merchandise, directly or indirectly, including all ordering, referring, and prescribing, to a Medi-Cal beneficiary and that has been enrolled in the Medi-Cal program.

(p) “Resolution of an investigation for fraud or abuse” means there is no documentation to indicate either that a charge or accusation has been filed against the provider and either (1) the investigation has not been active at any time during the
 previous 12 months or (2) the department has made a documented good faith effort and has been unable, for a period of 12 months, to contact an investigator or responsible representative of any agency investigating the provider.

(q) “Unnecessary or substandard items or services” means those that are either of the following:

(1) Substantially in excess of the provider’s usual charges or costs for the items or services.

(2) Furnished, or caused to be furnished, to patients, whether or not covered by Medicare, Medicaid, or any of the state health care programs to which the definitions of applicant and provider apply, and which are substantially in excess of the patient’s needs, or of a quality that fails to meet professionally recognized standards of health care. The department’s determination that the items or services
 furnished were excessive or of unacceptable quality shall be made on the basis of information, including sanction reports, from the following sources:

(A) The professional review organization for the area served by the individual or entity.

(B) State or local licensing or certification authorities.

(C) Fiscal agents or contractors or private insurance companies.

(D) State or local professional societies.

(E) Any other sources deemed appropriate by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 271, Sec. 1.   (SB 299)   Effective September 4, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.15.

(a) The department may adopt regulations for certification of each applicant and each provider in the Medi-Cal program. No certification shall be required for natural persons licensed or certificated under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act.

(b) (1) An applicant or provider who is a natural person, and is licensed or certificated pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, or is a professional corporation, as defined in subdivision (b) of
 Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, shall comply with Section 14043.26 and shall be enrolled in the Medi-Cal program as either an individual provider or as a rendering provider in a provider group for each application package submitted and approved pursuant to Section 14043.26, notwithstanding that the applicant or provider meets the requirements to qualify as exempt from clinic licensure under subdivision (a) or (m) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A provider enrolled in the Medi-Cal program pursuant to paragraph (1), who has disclosed in the application package for enrollment that the provider’s practice includes the rendering of services, goods, supplies, or merchandise solely at one, or at more than one, health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or clinic, as defined in Section
 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, or medical therapy unit, for purposes of Section 123950 of the Health and Safety Code, or residence of the provider’s patient, or office of a physician and surgeon involved in the care and treatment of the provider’s patients, shall not be required to enroll at each such health facility, clinic, medical therapy unit, patient’s residence, or physician and surgeon’s office location and may utilize the business addresses listed on the application for enrollment pursuant to paragraph (1) to claim reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program for services rendered by the provider to Medi-Cal beneficiaries at all of those health facilities, clinics, medical therapy units, residences, or physician offices.

(3) This subdivision shall not be interpreted to allow the violation of any state or federal law governing
 fiscal intermediaries or Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act. This subdivision does not remove the requirement that each claim for reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program identify the place of service and the rendering, ordering, referring, and prescribing provider, where applicable.

(c) An applicant or provider licensed as a clinic pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1200) of, or a health facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of, Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code may be enrolled in the Medi-Cal program as a clinic or a health facility and need not comply with Section 14043.26 if the clinic or health facility is certified by the department to participate in the Medi-Cal program.

(d) An applicant or provider that meets the requirements to qualify as exempt from clinic licensure under subdivisions (b) to (l), inclusive, or subdivisions (n) to (p), inclusive, of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code shall comply with Section 14043.26 and may be enrolled in the Medi-Cal program as either a clinic or within any other provider category for which the applicant or provider qualifies. An applicant or provider to which any of the clinic licensure exemptions specified in this subdivision apply shall identify the licensure exemption category and document in its application package the legal and factual basis for the clinic license exemption claimed.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), an applicant or provider need not enroll in the Medi-Cal program as a separate provider and need not comply with Section 14043.26 if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The applicant or provider is one of the following:

(A) An
 intermittent site that qualifies as exempt from clinic licensure under subdivision (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) An affiliated mobile health care unit licensed or approved under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1765.101) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and qualifies as exempt from clinic licensure under subdivision (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The applicant or provider is operated by, and all staffing, protocols, equipment, supplies, and billing services are provided, directly or indirectly, by, one of the following:

(A) A licensed primary care clinic.

(B) A clinic exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The licensed primary care clinic or clinic exempt from licensure under subdivision (b) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code operating the applicant, provider clinic, or mobile health care unit has notified the department of its separate locations, premises, intermittent sites, or mobile health care units.

(f) A primary care clinic with (1) an additional physical plant added to its primary care clinic license under a consolidated license pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1212 of the Health and Safety Code, or (2) a physical plant that was added to an existing primary care clinic license by the State Department of Public Health, prior to January 1, 2017, whether by a regional district office or the centralized application unit, need not separately enroll
 the additional physical plant as a separate provider, and need not comply with Section 14043.26 if the primary care clinic has notified the department of its additional physical plant.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law and to the extent permitted by federal law, an applicant or provider that meets the requirements to qualify as a mobile optometric office pursuant to Section 3070.2 of the Business and Professions Code and Section 14043.26 may be enrolled in the Medi-Cal program as either a mobile optometric office or within any other provider category for which the applicant or provider qualifies.

(1) An applicant or provider to which Section 3070.2 of the Business and Professions Code applies shall demonstrate its compliance by providing proof of its nonprofit or
 charitable
 organization status pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code and a statement that it shall not accept payment for services other than those provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries, even if the State Board of Optometry has not yet issued final regulations as required by Section 3070.2 of the Business and Professions Code or issued any registrations at the time of enrollment.

(2) A mobile optometric office shall use the address of the owner and operator of the mobile optometric office as registered with the State Board of Optometry for its place of business address and shall not be required to comply with Section 51000.60 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) To the extent federal financial participation is available, a mobile
 optometric office shall be permitted to bill the Medi-Cal program for the professional optometry services provided by licensed optometrists. The licensed optometrists providing service at a mobile optometric office shall use the address of the owner and operator of the mobile optometric office as registered with the State Board of Optometry for its place of business address and shall not be required to comply with Section 51000.60 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 448, Sec. 2.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.17.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, within 30 calendar days of receiving confirmation of certification for enrollment as a Medi-Cal provider for an affiliate primary care clinic that is licensed pursuant to Section 1218.1 of the Health and Safety Code, the department shall provide written notice to the applicant informing the applicant that its Medi-Cal enrollment is approved.

(b) The department shall enroll the affiliate primary care clinic retroactive to the date of certification.

(c) This section shall not be construed to limit the department’s authority pursuant to Section 14043.37, 14043.4, or 14043.7 to conduct background checks,
 preenrollment inspections, or unannounced visits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 356, Sec. 1.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.2.

(a) Whether or not regulations for certification are adopted under Section 14043.15, in order to be enrolled as a provider, or for enrollment as a provider to continue, an applicant or provider may be required to sign a provider agreement and shall disclose all information as required in federal Medicaid regulations and any other information required by the department. Applicants, providers, and persons with an ownership or control interest, as defined in federal Medicaid regulations, shall submit their date of birth and their social security number or numbers to the department, to the full extent allowed under federal law. Corporations with an ownership or control interest, as defined in federal Medicaid regulations, shall submit their taxpayer identification number and all business address locations and post office box
 addresses. The director may designate the form of a provider agreement by provider type. Failure to disclose the required information, or the disclosure of false information, shall result in denial of the application for enrollment or shall make the provider subject to temporary suspension from the Medi-Cal program, which shall include temporary deactivation of the provider’s number or numbers, including all business addresses used by the provider to obtain reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program.

(b) The director shall notify the provider of the temporary suspension and deactivation of the provider’s number or numbers, including all business addresses used by the provider, and the effective date thereof.

(c) (1) In addition to the grounds for denial or temporary suspension described in subdivision (a), the department shall deny an application for enrollment or terminate the enrollment of a provider if the applicant or provider discloses an affiliation, as defined in Section 455.101 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, within the previous five years with any person or entity that has experienced a disclosable event, as defined in Section 455.101 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if the department determines that the affiliation poses an undue risk of fraud, waste, or abuse to the Medi‑Cal program.

(2) In determining whether an affiliation poses an undue risk of fraud, waste, or abuse to the Medi-Cal program, the department shall apply the factors set forth in Section 455.107(f) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Legally
 protected health care activity, as defined in Title 1.81.7 (commencing with Section 1798.300) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, shall not, by virtue of the nature of that activity alone, constitute fraud, waste, or abuse to the Medi-Cal program.

(3) In accordance with Section 455.107(h) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department may take action under this subdivision, up to and including denial or termination, regardless of whether the provider fully and timely discloses the affiliation, if the affiliation poses an undue risk of fraud, waste, or abuse to the Medi-Cal program.

(4) This section shall be implemented only upon receipt of all necessary federal approvals and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(d) Notwithstanding
 Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 14123, proceedings after the imposition of sanctions provided for in subdivision (a) or (c) shall be in accordance with Section 14043.65.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 20.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.25.

(a) The application form for enrollment, the provider agreement, and all attachments or changes to either, shall be signed under penalty of perjury.

(b) The department may require that the application form for enrollment, the provider agreement, and all attachments or changes to either, submitted by an applicant or provider licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, be notarized.

(c) Application forms for enrollment, provider agreements, and all attachments or changes to either, submitted by an applicant or provider not subject to
 subdivision (b) shall be notarized. This subdivision shall not apply with respect to providers under the In-Home Supportive Services program or any providers that choose to enroll electronically.
